Mississippi, session 2026, HB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Small Municipality Street and Infrastructure Improvement Pilot Program, which shall be administered by the Mississippi Development Authority (MDA) to assist eligible municipalities with populations under ten thousand (10,000) with construction, engineering, and related costs associated with water, sewer, street overlay and roadway improvement projects. (2)  MDA shall award the funds in the program on a competitive basis to municipalities meeting eligibility criteria established by MDA.  Eligibility and prioritization criteria for the funds may include, but shall not be limited to: (a)  Population under ten thousand (10,000); (b)  Demonstrated infrastructure need; (c)  Project readiness, including completed or substantially completed engineering and cost estimates; (d)  Availability of local matching funds; and (e)  Rural or underserved community status. (3)  Eligible uses of funds may include, but shall not be limited to: (a)  Water and sewer projects; (b)  Street and roadway overlay projects; (c)  Engineering, design, and planning costs; and (d)  Construction-related expenses directly associated with approved infrastructure projects. (4)  MDA may promulgate rules, guidelines, and application procedures necessary to administer the program and may require participating municipalities to submit documentation, certifications, and post-project reports demonstrating the use of funds and the impact of funded projects. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.